test/src/morphology/V-moonnad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mõõnnâd: # Verb 'to go' - full paradigm
     mõõnnâd+V+Inf: mõõnnâd
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mõõnam
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mõõnak
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mâânn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mõõnnâp
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mõõnnveˊted
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mâˊnne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: mõõnât
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mõõn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mõˊnnem
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mõˊnniǩ
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mõõni
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: mõõnim
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mõõnid
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mõˊnne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: mõˊnneš
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg1: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg2: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg3: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Pl1: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Pl2: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Pl3: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+4: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg1: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg2: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg3: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Pl1: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Pl2: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Pl3: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+4: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Imp+Sg2: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Imp+Sg3: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Imp+Pl1: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Imp+Pl2: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Imp+Pl3: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Imp+ConNeg: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+ActEss: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+Action: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+PrsPrc: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+PrfPrc: mõõnnâm
     mõõnnâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+VAbess: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+GerTemp: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+GerInstr: mõ
     mõõnnâd+V+PrfPrc: mõ
